Washington statutes.
RCW 19.31.060

Request from employer for interview required—Information to be furnished applicant.

No employment agency shall send any applicant on an interview with a prospective employer without having first obtained, either orally or in writing, a bona fide request from such employer for the interview: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That, it shall be the duty of every employment agency to give to each applicant for employment, orally or in writing, before being sent on an interview, information as to the name and address of the person to whom the applicant is to apply for such employment, the kind of service to be performed, the anticipated rate of wages or compensation, the agency's fee based on such anticipated wages or compensation, whether such employment is permanent or temporary, and the name and address of the natural person authorizing the interviewing of such applicant.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 51 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 228 s 6.]